Utah statutes.
77-5-2.   Chief justice to preside, when.

When the governor is on trial, the chief justice of the Supreme Court shall preside, and, in case he is disqualified or unable to act, the Senate shall select some other justice of the Supreme Court to preside.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

